Maine, session 132, LD520.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §2792, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 361, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Pooled market established. Subject to the requirements of subsection 5, all
individual and small group health plans offered in this State with effective dates of coverage
on or after January 1, 2023 must be offered through a pooled market. A health insurance
carrier offering an individual health plan subject to this section shall make the plan
available to all eligible small employers within the plan's approved service area, and a
health insurance carrier offering a small group health plan subject to this section shall make
the plan available to all eligible individuals residing within the plan's approved service area.
This subsection does not require the Maine Health Insurance Marketplace established in
Title 22, chapter 1479 to offer identical choices of health plans to individuals and to small
employers under Title 22, chapter 1479.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §2792, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 653, Pt. B, §2, is
amended to read:
2. Premium rates. Premium rates for a health plan offered in the pooled market
described in subsection 1 may not vary based on whether the plan is issued to an individual
or to a small employer. Rate filings and review for the pooled market are subject to the
provisions of sections 2736 to 2736‑C. For health plans that are issued on other than a
calendar year basis, rates applicable on and after January 1st of any plan year must be the
approved rates for the most similar plan offered during the new calendar year, adjusted by
a factor, approved by the superintendent as part of the rating plan, that appropriately
accounts for any differences in plan design.
Sec. 3. 24-A MRSA §2793, as amended by PL 2021, c. 361, §3, is further amended
to read:
§2793. Clear choice designs
The superintendent shall develop clear choice designs for health plans in order to
reduce consumer confusion and provide meaningful choices for consumers by promoting
a level playing field on which carriers compete on the basis of price and quality. The
superintendent shall develop separate clear choice designs for individual and small group
health plans.
1. Clear choice design. For the purposes of this section, "clear choice design" means
a set of annual copayments, coinsurance and deductibles for all or a designated subset of
the essential health benefits. An individual health plan subject to section 2736‑C or a pooled
market health plan subject to section 2792 must conform to one of the clear choice designs
developed pursuant to this section unless it is approved as an alternative plan under
subsection 4.
2. Development of clear choice designs. The superintendent shall develop clear
choice designs in consultation with working groups consisting of consumers, carriers,
health policy experts and other interested persons. The superintendent shall adopt rules for
clear choice designs, taking into consideration the ability of plans to conform to actuarial
value ranges, consumer needs and promotion of benefits with high value and return on
investment. The superintendent shall develop at least one clear choice design for each tier
Page 1 - 132LR1960(01)

414 of health insurance plan designated as bronze, silver, gold and platinum in accordance with
425 the federal Affordable Care Act. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
436 technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A. Clear choice designs
447 apply to all individual health plans offered in this State with effective dates of coverage on
458 or after January 1, 2022 and to all small group health plans offered through the pooled
469 market under section 2792. No later than January 31st of each year, the superintendent
570 shall release the proposed clear choice designs to be used in the following plan year for
581 review and comment by stakeholders.
3. Annual review. The superintendent shall consider annually whether to revise,
discontinue or add any clear choice designs for use by carriers in the following calendar
year, including but not limited to considering whether deductible and copayment levels
should be changed to reflect medical inflation and conform with actuarial value and annual
maximum out-of-pocket limits.
4. Alternative plan designs. In addition to one or more health plans that include cost-
sharing parameters consistent with a clear choice design developed pursuant to this section,
a carrier may offer up to 3 individual health plan designs and up to 3 small group health
plan designs that modify one or more specific cost-sharing parameters in a clear choice
design if the carrier submits an actuarial certification to the satisfaction of the
superintendent that the alternative plan design offers significant consumer benefits and
does not result in adverse selection. An alternative plan design may be offered only in a
service area where the carrier offers at least one clear choice design plan at the same tier.